Maryland, session 2025, HB0864.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–503.
(a) In each county in the first seven judicial circuits there shall be the number of
resident judges of the circuit court set forth below, including the judge or judges provided
for by the Constitution:
(1) Allegany ................................................................................................... 2
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0864*

HOUSE BILL 864
(2) Anne Arundel ........................................................................................ 13
(3) Baltimore County .................................................................................. 21
(4) Calvert ..................................................................................................... 3
(5) Caroline ................................................................................................... 1
(6) Carroll...................................................................................................... 4
(7) Cecil ......................................................................................................... 4
(8) Charles .................................................................................................... 5
(9) Dorchester ............................................................................................... 1
(10) Frederick ................................................................................................. 6
(11) Garrett ..................................................................................................... 1
(12) Harford .................................................................................................... 6
(13) Howard .................................................................................................... 5
(14) Kent ......................................................................................................... 1
(15) Montgomery .......................................................................................... 24
(16) Prince George’s ..................................................................................... 25
(17) Queen Anne’s .......................................................................................... 1
(18) St. Mary’s .......................................................................................... [3] 4
(19) Somerset .................................................................................................. 1
(20) Talbot ....................................................................................................... 1
(21) Washington ............................................................................................ 6
(22) Wicomico .................................................................................................. 4
(23) Worcester ................................................................................................. 3
(b) In Baltimore City there shall be 35 resident judges of the Circuit Court for
Baltimore City.

HOUSE BILL 864 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.